California, session 20252026, SB856.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30103.5 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 30108.1 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 30166 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30166. In Los Angeles County:(a) In three locations within the Santa Monica Mountains, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on maps 22, 23, and 24.(b) In the Temescal Canyon watershed in the City of Los Angeles, all lands owned or controlled by the Presbyterian Synod, the University of California, the Los Angeles County Sanitation District, and the Los Angeles Unified School District are added.(c) In the Cities of Los Angeles and El Segundo, the areas east of Vista del Mar that include the Scattergood Steam Plant, the Hyperion Sewage Treatment Plant, and portions of an oil refinery are excluded as specifically shown on map 25. In adopting this boundary change, the Legislature specifically reaffirms the existing location of the coastal zone boundary in the Venice area of the City of Los Angeles.(d) In the City of Manhattan Beach, approximately 140 acres, and in the City of Hermosa Beach, approximately 170 acres, are excluded as specifically shown on maps 25 and 26.(e) In the City of Palos Verdes Estates, approximately 95 acres landward of Paseo del Mar are excluded as specifically shown on map 26.(f) In the City of Long Beach, the area near Colorado Lagoon is excluded as specifically shown on map 27.(g) In the City of Long Beach, the area commencing at the intersection of the existing coastal zone boundary at Colorado Street and Pacific Coast Highway, thence southerly along Pacific Coast Highway to the intersection of Loynes Drive, thence easterly along Loynes Drive to the intersection of Los Cerritos Channel, thence northerly along Los Cerritos Channel to the existing coastal zone boundary, is excluded as specifically shown on map 27A.(h) Notwithstanding map number 138 adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone in Los Angeles County in the vicinity of Los Angeles International Airport shall be the Pershing Drive built after January 1, 1970, rather than the Pershing Drive built before that date.SEC. 4. Section 30168 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30168. In Orange County:(a) In the City of Huntington Beach, approximately 9.5 acres are added as specifically shown on map 28.(b) In the City of Costa Mesa, approximately 15 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 28.(c) In the City of Newport Beach, approximately 22.6 acres adjacent to Pacific Coast Highway are added as specifically shown on map 28; provided, however, that the area described in this subdivision shall be excluded from the coastal zone, if the Department of Transportation, within one year from the effective date of this act, enters into an agreement for use of this area for hospital-related purposes.(d) In the Niguel Hill area, the developed portions of Pacific Island Village are excluded as specifically shown on map 29.(e) In the communities of Dana Point and Laguna Niguel, approximately 450 acres inland of the Pacific Coast Highway are excluded as specifically shown on map 29A.(f) In the community of Capistrano Beach, approximately 381 acres seaward of the San Diego Freeway are excluded as specifically shown on map 29A.(g) In the City of San Clemente, approximately 230 acres seaward of the San Diego Freeway are added as specifically shown on map 29B, dated September 1, 1981, and filed on September 1, 1981, with the Office of the Secretary of State.(h) In the City of San Clemente, approximately 214 acres inland and seaward of the San Diego Freeway are excluded as specifically shown on maps 29A and 30.(i) Notwithstanding map number 149 adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone in the area of the City of San Juan Capistrano in Orange County shall exclude all portions of the City of San Juan Capistrano and shall follow Camino Capistrano and Via Serra and generally an extension of Via Serra to the point where it joins the existing coastal zone boundary.SEC. 5. Section 30340.6 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30340.6. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all costs mandated by the operation of this division be paid either with state or federal funds or both. The Legislature hereby declares that Section 30340.5 is designed to ensure that local governments are paid for legitimate claims for costs mandated by this division or the commission, costs for work that is not optional, and costs that are not otherwise reimbursed.(b) In the event a claimed mandated cost has been approved by the Controller pursuant to Section 30340.5 and the Legislature fails to appropriate the funds to pay those claims by special legislation or in the annual state budget for the fiscal year following approval of the claims by the Controller, any dates specified in this division or by order of the commission for the submission of a local coastal program or any portion of a local coastal program or for the performance of any task or duty by a claimant local government whose approved claim has not been paid shall, at the request of the claimant local government, be postponed by the number of years elapsing between the specified date and the year in which the funds to pay the approved claim are provided.(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any local government if the Legislature determines that the local government’s claim should not be paid because the claim is not of the type intended to be subject to reimbursement pursuant to Section 30340.5.SEC. 6. Section 30517 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30517. The commission may extend, for a period of not to exceed one year, any time limitation established by this chapter for good cause.SEC. 7. Section 30600.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30600.5. (a) Before the certification of a local coastal program and notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 30519, after the effective date of this section, the authority for issuance of coastal development permits provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be delegated to local governments pursuant to the provisions of this section.(b) Except for any development specified in subdivision (b) of Section 30519 and Section 30601 or with respect to any development proposed by any state agency, the authority for issuance of coastal development permits provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be delegated to the respective local governments within 120 days after (1) the effective date of certification of a land use plan pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) or (2) the effective date of this section, whichever occurs last. This delegation shall only apply with respect to those areas governed by the certified land use plan or a certified portion of the land use plan, applicable to an identifiable geographic area.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, after delegation of authority to issue coastal development permits pursuant to subdivision (b), a coastal development permit shall be issued by the respective local government or the commission on appeal, if that local government or the commission on appeal finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the certified land use plan.(d) Any action taken by a local government on a coastal development permit application pursuant to the provisions of this section may be appealed to the commission pursuant to Section 30602. The commission shall hear an appeal brought pursuant to the provisions of this section, unless it determines that the local government action taken raises no substantial issue as to conformity with the certified land use plan. For purposes of this subdivision, failure by any local government to act within any time limit specified in this division shall constitute an “action taken.”(e) The commission shall, following a public hearing and within 90 days after the effective date of this section, adopt minimum standards for public notice, hearing, and appeal procedures to govern local government review of coastal development permit applications pursuant to this section. The standards shall, as nearly as practical, follow the standards required for local agencies after certification of local coastal programs for appealable developments and shall ensure that the notice and hearing required for the coastal development permit can be provided at the same time as the notice and hearing requirements for other local land use decisions that may be necessary for the project requiring the permit. Within 60 days before assumption of authority for issuance of coastal development permits pursuant to this section, the local government shall provide drafts of all procedures for issuance of coastal development permits to the executive director of the commission. Delegation of the authority to issue coastal development permits pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not occur until the local government has provided copies of all the adopted procedures for the issuance of coastal development permits to the executive director of the commission. Any amendments to the procedures shall also be furnished to the executive director for their information.(f) Before the delegation of authority to issue coastal development permits as provided in subdivision (b), a local government, after appropriate notice and hearing, shall adopt an ordinance prescribing the procedures to be used in issuing coastal development permits. Each ordinance shall incorporate at least the minimum standards for public notice, hearings, and appeals established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (e). In addition, each ordinance shall contain provisions that prohibit the issuance of a coastal development permit for any development that may conflict with the ordinances that are being prepared to implement the certified land use plan.(g) In order to expedite certification of complete local coastal programs and the transfer of coastal development controls to local government, the commission shall, on request from a local government, prepare the ordinances necessary for that local government to implement the coastal permit responsibilities of this division.(h) The time limits set forth in subdivision (b) shall be extended, by right, for not more than 90 days if a local government, by resolution of its governing body, so requests.(i) The provisions of this section and of any local ordinance enacted pursuant thereto shall have no further force or effect or application after that local government’s local coastal program has been certified and taken effect pursuant to the provisions of this division.(j) This section shall become inoperative and shall have no force or effect on the date, if any, of a final judicial decision that its provisions are inconsistent with the requirements of the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq.), as amended.SEC. 8. Section 30620 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30620. (a) By January 30, 1977, the commission shall, consistent with this chapter, prepare interim procedures for the submission, review, and appeal of coastal development permit applications and of claims of exemption. These procedures shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Application and appeal forms.(2) Reasonable provisions for notification to the commission and other interested persons of an action taken by a local government pursuant to this chapter, in sufficient detail to ensure that a preliminary review of that action for conformity with this chapter can be made.(3) Interpretive guidelines designed to assist local governments, the commission, and persons subject to this chapter in determining how the policies of this division shall be applied in the coastal zone before the certification, and through the preparation and amendment, of local coastal programs. However, the guidelines shall not supersede, enlarge, or diminish the powers or authority of the commission or any other public agency.(b) No later than May 1, 1977, the commission shall, after public hearing, adopt permanent procedures that include the components specified in subdivision (a) and shall transmit a copy of those procedures to each local government within the coastal zone and make them readily available to the public. After May 1, 1977, the commission may, from time to time, and, except in cases of emergency, after public hearing, modify or adopt additional procedures or guidelines that the commission determines to be necessary to better carry out the purposes of this division.(c) (1) The commission may require a reasonable filing fee and the reimbursement of expenses for the processing by the commission of an application for a coastal development permit under this division and, except for local coastal program submittals, for any other filing, including, but not limited to, a request for revocation, categorical exclusion, or boundary adjustment, that is submitted for review by the commission.(2) A coastal development permit fee that is collected by the commission under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Coastal Act Services Fund established pursuant to Section 30620.1. This paragraph does not authorize an increase in fees or create any new authority on the part of the commission.(3) (A) The commission may waive the filing fee for an application for a coastal development permit or permit amendment required under this division.(B) When considering a request for a waiver of a filing fee pursuant to this paragraph, the commission shall give extra consideration to a private nonprofit organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code if the permit is required for a habitat restoration project or a project to provide public access to coastal resources.(C) When the commission waives the filing fee for an application for a coastal development permit or permit amendment for a project meeting the criteria in subparagraph (B), the commission may specify whether the waiver also applies to future applications for an amendment to the permit.(d) With respect to an appeal of an action taken by a local government pursuant to Section 30602 or 30603, the executive director shall, within five working days of receipt of an appeal from a person other than a member of the commission or a public agency, determine whether the appeal is patently frivolous. If the executive director determines that an appeal is patently frivolous, the appeal shall not be filed unless a filing fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) is deposited with the commission within five working days of the receipt of the executive director’s determination. If the commission subsequently finds that the appeal raises a substantial issue, the filing fee shall be refunded.SEC. 9. Section 30625 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30625. (a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in Section 30602, any appealable action on a coastal development permit or claim of exemption for any development by a local government or port governing body may be appealed to the commission by an applicant, any aggrieved person, or any two members of the commission. The commission may approve, modify, or deny the proposed development, and if no action is taken within the time limit specified in Sections 30621 and 30622, the decision of the local government or port governing body, as the case may be, shall become final, unless the time limit in Section 30621 or 30622 is waived by the applicant.(b) The commission shall hear an appeal unless it determines the following:(1) With respect to appeals pursuant to Section 30602, that no substantial issue exists as to conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).(2) With respect to appeals to the commission after certification of a local coastal program, that no substantial issue exists with respect to the grounds on which an appeal has been filed pursuant to Section 30603.(3) With respect to appeals to the commission after certification of a port master plan, that no substantial issue exists as to conformity with the certified port master plan.(c) Decisions of the commission, where applicable, shall guide local governments or port governing bodies in their future actions under this division.SEC. 10. Section 30714 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30714. After public notice, hearing, and consideration of comments and testimony received pursuant to Section 30712, the port governing body shall adopt its master plan and submit it to the commission for certification in accordance with this chapter. Within 90 days after the submittal, the commission, after public hearing, shall certify the plan or portion of a plan and reject any portion of a plan that is not certified. The commission may not modify the plan as submitted as a condition of certification. If the commission rejects any portion of a plan, it shall base that rejection upon written findings of fact and conclusion of law. If the commission fails to take action within the 90-day period, the port master plan shall be deemed certified. The commission shall certify the plan, or portion of a plan, if the commission finds both of the following:(a) The master plan, or certified portions of the master plan, conforms with and carries out the policies of this chapter.(b) Where a master plan, or certified portions of a master plan, provide for any of the developments listed as appealable in Section 30715, the development or developments are in conformity with all of the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).SEC. 11. Section 71212 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71212. On or before January 31, 2005, and updated triennially, the commission, in consultation with the board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the United States Coast Guard, shall submit to the Legislature, and make available to the public, a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(a) A summary of the information provided in the ballast water management report forms submitted to the commission, including the volumes of ballast water managed, volumes discharged into state waters, types of ballast water treatment, and locations at which ballast water was loaded and discharged.(b) Monitoring and inspection information collected by the commission pursuant to this division, including a summary of compliance rates, categorized by geographic area and other groupings as information allows.(c) An analysis of the monitoring and inspection information, including recommendations for actions to be undertaken to improve the effectiveness of the monitoring and inspection program.(d) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the measures taken to reduce or eliminate the discharge of nonindigenous species from vessels, including recommendations regarding action that should be taken to improve the effectiveness of those measures.(e) A summary of the research completed during the three-year period that precedes the release of the report, and ongoing research, on the release of nonindigenous species by vessels.SEC. 12. Section 71212.1 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:71212.1. On or before April 30, 2026, and updated semiannually, the commission shall publish on its internet website both of the following:(a) A summary of the information provided in the ballast water management report forms submitted to the commission, including vessel arrival data indicating vessel type and arrival port, and volumes of ballast water discharged into state waters by vessel type and arrival port.(b) Inspection and compliance rates for vessels, as available.